Utah statutes.
53B-17-401.   College of Mines and Earth Sciences -- Beneficiary of land grants -- Courses of study.

(1)  There is established a College of Mines and Earth Sciences at the University of Utah.

(2)  The college is the beneficiary of all land grants and appropriations made or to be made by the United States to the state for the establishment and maintenance of a school of mines.

(3)  The college may offer courses in and related to mining, metallurgical and electrical engineering, and other branches of engineering that pertain to mining.



Amended by Chapter 32, 1988 General Session

